Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-211
Chief Water Officer; measuring devices; gauge height reports; requirements; violation; penalty.

The Chief Water Officer may direct managers or operators of interstate ditches to construct and maintain suitable measuring devices at or near the state line in Nebraska. A manager or operator shall within thirty days after receipt of notice from the Chief Water Officer construct and complete installation of such a measuring device and shall furnish daily gauge height reports to the Chief Water Officer from the beginning to the end of the irrigation season, in such form and manner as recommended by the Chief Water Officer. Failure of any manager or operator of an interstate ditch to comply with this section shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 31, p. 846;

C.S.1922, § 8450;

C.S.1929, § 81-6331;

R.S.1943, § 46-213;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 256;

Laws 1991, LB 276, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-213;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 337.